Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-556
Surrender of license and registration; failure; department to obtain possession; peace or law enforcement officer; duties.

(1) Any person (a) whose license or registration shall have been suspended as herein provided, (b) whose policy of insurance or bond, when required under sections 60-501 to 60-569, shall have been canceled or terminated, or (c) who shall neglect to furnish other proof upon the request of the department shall immediately return his or her license and registration to the department. If any person shall fail to return to the department the license or registration as provided herein, the department shall forthwith direct any peace officer or authorized representative of the department to secure possession thereof and to return the same to the department.

(2) It shall be the duty of the peace officer or law enforcement officer who is directed to secure possession of the license and registration under subsection (1) of this section to make every reasonable effort to secure the license and registration and return such to the department or to show good cause, as that is determined by the department, why such license or registration is unable to be returned.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 56, p. 502;

Laws 1953, c. 207, § 10, p. 727;

Laws 1980, LB 672, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 174, § 3.